Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-566
Interference with person hunting, trapping, or fishing; affirmative defense.

It shall be an affirmative defense in any action brought for violation of section 37-564 that the person against whom such action is brought was not trespassing at the time of the alleged intentional interference or attempted interference and was engaged in a lawful activity in conflict with hunting, trapping, or fishing or activity associated with hunting, trapping, or fishing described in such section.

Laws 1995, LB 274, § 4;

R.S.Supp.,1996, § 37-529.03;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 286.